sl-SI: Oblika medijskega predvajalnika: Ključek; Mikro konzola; Prenosni medijski predvajalnik; Ploščica; TV sprejemnik; Pretočna palčka; Drugo
tr: Medya oynatıcı form faktörü: Dongle; Mikro konsol; Taşınabilir medya oynatıcı; Disk; Set üstü kutusu; Yayın çubuğu; Diğer
nb: Mediespiller formfaktor: Dongle; Mikrokonsoll; Bærbar mediespiller; Puck; Dekoder; Strømmepinne; Annet
hu: Médialejátszó-formátum: Dongle; Mikrokonzol; Hordozható médialejátszó; Korong; Beltéri egység; Streaming stick; Egyéb
ja: メディアプレーヤーのフォームファクター: ドングル; マイクロコンソール; ポータブルメディアプレーヤー; パック; セットトップボックス; ストリーミングスティック; その他
ko: 미디어 플레이어 폼 팩터: 동글; 마이크로 콘솔; 휴대용 미디어 플레이어; 퍽; 셋톱박스; 스트리밍 스틱; 기타
nl: Mediaspeler vormfactor: Dongle; Microconsole; Draagbare mediaspeler; Puck; Settopbox; Streamingstick; Andere
zh-CN: 媒体播放器外形: 加密狗; 微型主机; 便携式媒体播放器; 圆盘式; 机顶盒; 流媒体棒; 其他
lt-LT: Medijos grotuvo formos faktorius: Adapteris; Mikro konsolė; Nešiojamas medijos grotuvas; Ritulys; Televizijos priedėlis; Transliavimo lazdelė; Kita
da: Medieafspillerens formfaktor: Dongle; Mikrokonsol; Bærbar medieafspiller; Puck; Set-top-boks; Streamingpind; Andet
ro-RO: Factor de formă media player: Dongle; Micro consolă; Player media portabil; Puc; Set-top box; Stick de streaming; Altele
pl: Format odtwarzacza multimedialnego: Dongle; Mikrokonsola; Przenośny odtwarzacz multimedialny; Krążek; Przystawka; Stick strumieniowy; Inne
fr: Facteur de forme du lecteur multimédia: Clé; Micro console; Lecteur multimédia portable; Rondelle; Boîtier décodeur; Clé de diffusion; Autre
sv: Mediaspelares formfaktor: Dongel; Mikrokonsol; Bärbar mediaspelare; Puck; Digitalbox; Streamingsticka; Övrigt
sk-SK: Tvar prehrávača médií: Dongle; Mikrokonzola; Prenosný multimediálny prehrávač; Puk; Set-top box; Streamovací stick; Iné
de: Media-Player-Formfaktor: Dongle; Mikro-Konsole; Tragbarer Mediaplayer; Puck; Set-Top-Box; Streaming-Stick; Sonstiges
fi: Mediasoittimen muototekijä: Dongle; Mikrokonsoli; Kannettava mediasoitin; Kiekko; Digisovitin; Suoratoistotikku; Muu
es: Factor de forma del reproductor multimedia: Dongle; Microconsola; Reproductor multimedia portátil; Disco; Decodificador; Dispositivo de transmisión; Otros
vi: Kiểu dáng trình phát phương tiện: Dongle; Máy chơi game siêu nhỏ; Máy phát media di động; Hình tròn dẹt; Đầu thu; Thanh phát trực tuyến; Khác
it: Fattore di forma del lettore multimediale: Dongle; Micro console; Lettore multimediale portatile; Puck; Set-top box; Chiavetta streaming; Altro
zh-TW: 媒體播放器外型規格: 電視棒; 微型主機; 便攜式媒體播放器; 圓盤型; 機上盒; 串流棒; 其他
th: รูปแบบของเครื่องเล่นสื่อ: ดองเกิล; ไมโครคอนโซล; เครื่องเล่นมีเดียแบบพกพา; พัค; เซ็ตท็อปบ็อกซ์; สติกสตรีมมิ่ง; อื่นๆ
ru: Формфактор медиаплеера: Адаптер-донгл; Микроконсоль; Портативный медиаплеер; Шайба; Телеприставка; Стриминговая флешка; Другой
bg-BG: Типоразмер на медиен плейър: Донгъл; Микро конзола; Преносим медиен плейър; Шайба; Приставка; Стрийминг стик; Други
hr-HR: Oblik media playera: Dongle; Mikro konzola; Prijenosni medijski uređaj; Pak; Set-top box; Streaming stick; Ostalo
pt-PT: Formato do reprodutor de multimédia: Dongle; Micro consola; Leitor multimédia portátil; Disco; Set-top box; Stick de streaming; Outro
pt-BR: Formato do reprodutor de mídia: Dongle; Micro console; Reprodutor de mídia portátil; Disco; Decodificador; Dispositivo de streaming; Outro
cs: Provedení multimediálního přehrávače: Dongle; Mikrokonzole; Přenosný multimediální přehrávač; Puk; Set-top box; Streamovací tyčinka; Jiné
en: Media player form factor: Dongle; Micro console; Portable media player; Puck; Set-top box; Streaming stick; Other
el: Μορφή συσκευής αναπαραγωγής πολυμέσων: Dongle; Μικροκονσόλα; Φορητή συσκευή αναπαραγωγής πολυμέσων; Δίσκος; Αποκωδικοποιητής; Μπαστούνι streaming; Άλλο